Connecticut, session 2026, HB05344.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. Section 9-324 of the general statutes is repealed and the
2 following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026, and
3 applicable to complaints brought on or after July 1, 2026):
4 (a) Any elector or candidate who claims that such elector or candidate
5 is aggrieved by any ruling of any election official in connection with any
6 election for Governor, Lieutenant Governor, Secretary of the State, State
7 Treasurer, Attorney General, State Comptroller or judge of probate, held
8 in such elector's or candidate's town, or that there has been a mistake in
9 the count of the votes cast at such election for candidates for said offices
10 or any of them, at any voting district in such elector's or candidate's
11 town, or any candidate for such an office who claims that such candidate
12 is aggrieved by a violation of any provision of [section] sections 9-355,
13 9-357 to 9-361, inclusive, or section 9-364, 9-364a or 9-365 in the casting
14 of absentee ballots at such election or any candidate for the office of
15 Governor, Lieutenant Governor, Secretary of the State, State Treasurer,
16 Attorney General or State Comptroller, who claims that such candidate
sHB5344 / File No. 194 1

sHB5344 File No. 194
17 is aggrieved by a violation of any provision of sections 9-700 to 9-716,
18 inclusive, may bring such elector's or candidate's complaint [to any
19 judge of the Superior Court, in which such] in the superior court for the
20 judicial district of Hartford or for the judicial district of Bridgeport. Such
21 elector or candidate shall set out in the complaint the claimed errors of
22 such election official, the claimed errors in the count or the claimed
23 violations of said sections. In any action brought pursuant to the
24 provisions of this section, the complainant shall send a copy of the
25 complaint by first-class mail, or deliver a copy of the complaint by hand,
26 to the State Elections Enforcement Commission. If such complaint is
27 made prior to such election, [such judge] the court shall proceed
28 expeditiously to render judgment on the complaint and shall cause
29 notice of the hearing to be given to the Secretary of the State and the
30 State Elections Enforcement Commission. If such complaint is made
31 subsequent to the election, it shall be brought not later than fourteen
32 days after the election or, if such complaint is brought in response to the
33 manual tabulation of paper ballots authorized pursuant to section 9-
34 320f, such complaint shall be brought not later than seven days after the
35 close of any such manual tabulation. [and, in either such circumstance,
36 such judge]
37 (b) The court shall forthwith order a hearing to be [had] held upon
38 [such] a complaint filed under subsection (a) of this section, upon a day
39 not more than five nor less than three days from the making of such
40 order, and shall cause notice of not less than three nor more than five
41 days to be given to any candidate or candidates whose election may be
42 affected by the decision upon such hearing, to such election official, the
43 Secretary of the State, the State Elections Enforcement Commission and
44 to any other party or parties whom [such judge] the court deems proper
45 parties thereto, of the time and place for the hearing upon such
46 complaint. [Such judge] The court shall, on the day fixed for such
47 hearing and without unnecessary delay, proceed to hear the parties. If
48 sufficient reason is shown, [such judge] the court may order any voting
49 tabulators to be unlocked or any ballot boxes to be opened and a recount
50 of the votes cast, including absentee ballots, to be made. [Such judge]
51 The court shall thereupon, in case [such judge] the court finds any error
sHB5344 / File No. 194 2

sHB5344 File No. 194
52 in the rulings of the election official, any mistake in the count of the votes
53 or any violation of [said sections] any provision of sections 9-355, 9-357
54 to 9-361, inclusive, section 9-364, 9-364a or 9-365 or sections 9-700 to 9-
55 716, inclusive, certify the result of [such judge's] the court's finding or
56 decision to the Secretary of the State before the fifteenth day of the next
57 succeeding December. [Such judge] The court may order a new election
58 or a change in the existing election schedule. [Such certificate of such
59 judge of such judge's]
60 (c) The certificate of the court's finding or decision pursuant to
61 subsection (b) of this section shall be final and conclusive upon all
62 questions relating to errors in the rulings of such election officials, to the
63 correctness of such count, and, for the purposes of this section only, such
64 claimed violations, and shall operate to correct the returns of the
65 moderators or presiding officers, so as to conform to such finding or
66 decision, unless the same is appealed from as provided in section 9-325,
67 as amended by this act.
68 Sec. 2. Section 9-325 of the general statutes is repealed and the
69 following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026, and
70 applicable to complaints brought on or after July 1, 2026):
71 If, upon any such hearing [by a judge of the Superior Court] in the
72 superior court for the judicial district of Hartford or for the judicial
73 district of Bridgeport, any question of law is raised which any party to
74 the complaint claims should be reviewed by the Supreme Court, [such
75 judge] the court, instead of filing the certificate of [his] the court's
76 finding or decision with the Secretary of the State, shall transmit the
77 same, including therein such questions of law, together with a proper
78 finding of facts, to the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court, who shall
79 thereupon call a special session of [said court] the Supreme Court for
80 the purpose of an immediate hearing upon the questions of law so
81 certified. A copy of the finding and decision so certified by [the judge of
82 the Superior Court] such superior court, together with the decision of
83 the Supreme Court, on the questions of law therein certified, shall be
84 attested by the clerk of the Supreme Court, and by [him] such clerk
sHB5344 / File No. 194 3

sHB5344 File No. 194
85 transmitted to the Secretary of the State forthwith. The finding and
86 decision of [the judge of the Superior Court] such superior court,
87 together with the decision of the Supreme Court on the questions of law
88 thus certified, shall be final and conclusive upon all questions relating
89 to errors in the rulings of the election officials and to the correctness of
90 such count and shall operate to correct the returns of the moderators or
91 presiding officers so as to conform to such decision of [said court] the
92 Supreme Court. Nothing in this section shall be considered as
93 prohibiting an appeal to the Supreme Court from a final judgment of
94 [the Superior Court] such superior court. The judges of the Supreme
95 Court may establish rules of procedure for the speedy and inexpensive
96 hearing of such appeals within fifteen days of such judgment of [a judge
97 of the Superior Court] such superior court.
98 Sec. 3. Section 9-328 of the general statutes is repealed and the
99 following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026, and
100 applicable to complaints brought on or after July 1, 2026):
101 (a) Any elector or candidate claiming to have been aggrieved by any
102 ruling of any election official in connection with an election for any
103 municipal office or a primary for justice of the peace, or any elector or
104 candidate claiming that there has been a mistake in the count of votes
105 cast for any such office at such election or primary, or any candidate in
106 such an election or primary claiming that [he] such candidate is
107 aggrieved by a violation of any provision of sections 9-355, 9-357 to 9-
108 361, inclusive, or section 9-364, 9-364a or 9-365 in the casting of absentee
109 ballots at such election or primary, may bring a complaint [to any judge
110 of the Superior Court] in the superior court for the judicial district of
111 Hartford or for the judicial district of Bridgeport for relief therefrom. In
112 any action brought pursuant to the provisions of this section, the
113 complainant shall send a copy of the complaint by first-class mail, or
114 deliver a copy of the complaint by hand, to the State Elections
115 Enforcement Commission. If such complaint is made prior to such
116 election or primary, [such judge] the court shall proceed expeditiously
117 to render judgment on the complaint and shall cause notice of the
118 hearing to be given to the Secretary of the State and the State Elections
sHB5344 / File No. 194 4

sHB5344 File No. 194
119 Enforcement Commission. If such complaint is made subsequent to
120 such election or primary, it shall be brought not later than fourteen days
121 after such election or primary, except that if such complaint is brought
122 in response to the manual tabulation of paper ballots, authorized
123 pursuant to section 9-320f, such complaint shall be brought not later
124 than seven days after the close of any such manual tabulation, to any
125 judge of [the Superior Court] such superior court, in which [he] such
126 complainant shall set out the claimed errors of the election official, the
127 claimed errors in the count or the claimed violations of [said sections.
128 Such judge] any provision of sections 9-355, 9-357 to 9-361, inclusive, or
129 section 9-364, 9-364a or 9-365.
130 (b) The court shall forthwith order a hearing to be [had] held upon
131 [such] a complaint filed under subsection (a) of this section, upon a day
132 not more than five nor less than three days from the making of such
133 order, and shall cause notice of not less than three nor more than five
134 days to be given to any candidate or candidates whose election or
135 nomination may be affected by the decision upon such hearing, to such
136 election official, the Secretary of the State, the State Elections
137 Enforcement Commission and to any other party or parties whom [such
138 judge] the court deems proper parties thereto, of the time and place for
139 the hearing upon such complaint. [Such judge] The court shall, on the
140 day fixed for such hearing and without unnecessary delay, proceed to
141 hear the parties. If sufficient reason is shown, [he] the court may order
142 any voting tabulators to be unlocked or any ballot boxes to be opened
143 and a recount of the votes cast, including absentee ballots, to be made.
144 [Such judge] The court shall thereupon, if [he] the court finds any error
145 in the rulings of the election official or any mistake in the count of the
146 votes, certify the result of [his] the court's finding or decision to the
147 Secretary of the State before the tenth day succeeding the conclusion of
148 the hearing. [Such judge] The court may order a new election or primary
149 or a change in the existing election schedule. [Such certificate of such
150 judge of his]
151 (c) The certificate of the court's finding or decision under subsection
152 (b) of this section shall be final and conclusive upon all questions
sHB5344 / File No. 194 5

sHB5344 File No. 194
153 relating to errors in the ruling of such election officials, to the correctness
154 of such count, and, for the purposes of this section only, such claimed
155 violations, and shall operate to correct the returns of the moderators or
156 presiding officers, so as to conform to such finding or decision, except
157 that this section shall not affect the right of appeal to the Supreme Court
158 and [it] shall not prevent [such judge] such superior court from
159 reserving such questions of law for the advice of the Supreme Court as
160 provided in section 9-325, as amended by this act. Such [judge] superior
161 court may, if necessary, issue [his] a writ of mandamus, requiring the
162 adverse party and those under [him] such party to deliver to the
163 complainant the appurtenances of such office, and shall cause [his] such
164 superior court's finding and [decree] decision to be entered on the
165 records of the Superior Court in the proper judicial district.
166 Sec. 4. Section 9-329a of the general statutes is repealed and the
167 following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026, and
168 applicable to complaints brought on or after July 1, 2026):
169 (a) Any (1) elector or candidate aggrieved by a ruling of an election
170 official in connection with any primary held pursuant to (A) section 9-
171 423, 9-425 or 9-464, or (B) a special act, (2) elector or candidate who
172 alleges that there has been a mistake in the count of the votes cast at such
173 primary, or (3) candidate in such a primary who alleges that [he] such
174 candidate is aggrieved by a violation of any provision of sections 9-355,
175 9-357 to 9-361, inclusive, or section 9-364, 9-364a or 9-365 in the casting
176 of absentee ballots at such primary, may bring [his] a complaint [to any
177 judge of the Superior Court] in the superior court for the judicial district
178 of Hartford or for the judicial district of Bridgeport for appropriate
179 action. In any action brought pursuant to the provisions of this section,
180 the complainant shall file a certification attached to the complaint
181 indicating that a copy of the complaint has been sent by first-class mail
182 or delivered to the State Elections Enforcement Commission. If such
183 complaint is made prior to such primary, [such judge] the court shall
184 proceed expeditiously to render judgment on the complaint and shall
185 cause notice of the hearing to be given to the Secretary of the State and
186 the State Elections Enforcement Commission. If such complaint is made
sHB5344 / File No. 194 6

sHB5344 File No. 194
187 subsequent to such primary, [it] such complaint shall be brought [,] not
188 later than fourteen days after such primary [,] or, if such complaint is
189 brought in response to the manual tabulation of paper ballots [,]
190 described in section 9-320f, such complaint shall be brought [,] not later
191 than seven days after the close of any such manual tabulation, [to any
192 judge of the Superior Court] in such superior court.
193 (b) [Such judge] The court shall forthwith order a hearing to be held
194 upon [such] a complaint filed pursuant to subsection (a) of this section,
195 upon a day not more than five nor less than three days after the making
196 of such order, and shall cause notice of not less than three days to be
197 given to any candidate or candidates in any way directly affected by the
198 decision upon such hearing, to such election official, to the Secretary of
199 the State, the State Elections Enforcement Commission and to any other
200 person or persons, whom [such judge] the court deems proper parties
201 thereto, of the time and place of the hearing upon such complaint. [Such
202 judge] The court shall, on the day fixed for such hearing, and without
203 delay, proceed to hear the parties and determine the result. If, after
204 hearing, sufficient reason is shown, [such judge] the court may order
205 any voting tabulators to be unlocked or any ballot boxes to be opened
206 and a recount of the votes cast, including absentee ballots, to be made.
207 [Such judge] The court shall thereupon, if [he] the court finds any error
208 in the ruling of the election official, any mistake in the count of the votes
209 or any violation of [said sections] any provision of sections 9-355, 9-357
210 to 9-361, inclusive, or section 9-364, 9-364a or 9-365, certify the result of
211 [his] the court's finding or decision to the Secretary of the State before
212 the tenth day following the conclusion of the hearing. [Such judge] The
213 court may (1) determine the result of such primary; (2) order a change
214 in the existing primary schedule; or (3) order a new primary if [he] the
215 court finds that, but for the error in the ruling of the election official, any
216 mistake in the count of the votes or any violation of [said sections] any
217 provision of sections 9-355, 9-357 to 9-361, inclusive, or section 9-364, 9-
218 364a or 9-365, the result of such primary might have been different and
219 [he] the court is unable to determine the result of such primary.
220 (c) [The certification by the judge of his] The certificate of the court's
sHB5344 / File No. 194 7

sHB5344 File No. 194
221 finding or decision under subsection (b) of this section shall be final and
222 conclusive upon all questions relating to errors in the ruling of such
223 election official, to the correctness of such count, and, for the purposes
224 of this section only, such alleged violations, and shall operate to correct
225 any returns or certificates filed by the election officials, unless the same
226 is appealed from as provided in section 9-325, as amended by this act.
227 In the event a new primary is held pursuant to such [Superior Court]
228 order of such superior court, the result of such new primary shall be
229 final and conclusive unless a complaint is brought pursuant to this
230 section. The clerk of [the] such superior court shall forthwith transmit a
231 copy of such findings and order to the Secretary of the State.
232 Sec. 5. Section 9-329b of the general statutes is repealed and the
233 following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026, and
234 applicable to complaints brought on or after July 1, 2026):
235 [(a) At any time prior to a primary held before April 1, 2024, and
236 pursuant to sections 9-423, 9-425 and 9-464, or a special act, or prior to
237 any election held before April 1, 2024, the Superior Court may issue an
238 order removing a candidate from a ballot where it is shown that such
239 candidate is improperly on the ballot.]
240 [(b)] At any time prior to the commencement of the period of early
241 voting at a primary held [on or after April 1, 2024, and] pursuant to
242 sections 9-423, 9-425 and 9-464, or a special act, or prior to the
243 commencement of the period of early voting at any election, [held on or
244 after April 1, 2024, the Superior Court] the superior court for the judicial
245 district of Hartford or for the judicial district of Bridgeport may issue an
246 order removing a candidate from a ballot where it is shown that such
247 candidate is improperly on the ballot.
248 Sec. 6. Subparagraph (B) of subdivision (2) of subsection (b) of section
249 9-368j of the general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted
250 in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026, and applicable to complaints brought
251 on or after July 1, 2026):
252 (B) (i) In determining whether divergent voting patterns occur in a
sHB5344 / File No. 194 8

sHB5344 File No. 194
253 municipality or whether a method of election in such municipality
254 results in a dilutive effect on the vote of protected class members, the
255 superior court for the judicial district [in which such municipality is
256 located] of Hartford or for the judicial district of Bridgeport (I) shall
257 consider elections held prior to the filing of an action pursuant to this
258 section as more probative than elections conducted after such filing, (II)
259 shall consider evidence concerning elections for any municipal office in
260 such municipality as more probative than evidence concerning elections
261 for other offices, but may still afford probative value to evidence
262 concerning elections for such other offices, (III) shall consider statistical
263 evidence as more probative than nonstatistical evidence, (IV) in the case
264 of claims brought on behalf of two or more protected classes that are
265 politically cohesive in such municipality, shall combine members of
266 such protected classes to determine whether voting by such combined
267 protected class members is divergent from other electors and shall not
268 require evidence that voting by each such protected class's members is
269 separately divergent from such other electors, and (V) shall not require
270 evidence concerning the intent of electors, elected officials or such
271 municipality to discriminate against protected class members.
272 (ii) Evidence concerning the causes of, or reasons for, the occurrence
273 of divergent voting patterns shall not be deemed relevant to the
274 determination of whether divergent voting patterns occur or whether a
275 method of election results in a dilutive effect on the vote of protected
276 class members.
277 Sec. 7. Subdivision (1) of subsection (c) of section 9-368j of the general
278 statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof
279 (Effective July 1, 2026, and applicable to complaints brought on or after July 1,
280 2026):
281 (c) (1) In determining whether, based on the totality of the
282 circumstances, an impairment of the right to vote for any protected class
283 member in a municipality, or of the opportunity or ability of protected
284 class members in a municipality to participate in the political process
285 and elect candidates of their choice or otherwise influence the outcome
sHB5344 / File No. 194 9

sHB5344 File No. 194
286 of elections, has occurred, the superior court for the judicial district [in
287 which such municipality is located] of Hartford or for the judicial
288 district of Bridgeport may consider factors that include, but are not
289 limited to: (A) The history of discrimination in or affecting the
290 municipality or state; (B) the extent to which protected class members
291 have been elected to office in the municipality; (C) the use of any
292 qualification for eligibility to be an elector or other prerequisite to
293 voting, any statute, ordinance, regulation or other law regarding the
294 administration of elections, or any standard, practice, procedure or
295 policy, by the municipality that may enhance the dilutive effects of a
296 method of election in such municipality; (D) the extent of any history of
297 unequal access on the part of protected class members or candidates to
298 election administration or campaign finance processes that determine
299 which candidates will receive access to the ballot or financial or other
300 support in a given election for an office of the municipality; (E) the
301 extent to which protected class members in the municipality or state
302 have historically made expenditures, as defined in section 9-601b, at
303 lower rates than other individuals in such municipality or state; (F) the
304 extent to which protected class members in the municipality or state
305 vote at lower rates than other electors in the municipality or state, as
306 applicable; (G) the extent to which protected class members in the
307 municipality are disadvantaged, or otherwise bear the effects of public
308 or private discrimination, in areas that may hinder their ability to
309 participate effectively in the political process, such as education,
310 employment, health, criminal justice, housing, transportation, land use
311 or environmental protection; (H) the extent to which protected class
312 members in the municipality are disadvantaged in other areas that may
313 hinder their ability to participate effectively in the political process; (I)
314 the use of overt or subtle racial appeals in political campaigns in the
315 municipality or surrounding the adoption or maintenance of a
316 challenged practice; (J) the extent to which candidates face hostility or
317 barriers while campaigning due to their membership in a protected
318 class; (K) a significant or recurring lack of responsiveness on the part of
319 elected officials of the municipality to the particularized needs of a
320 community or communities of protected class members, except that
sHB5344 / File No. 194 10

sHB5344 File No. 194
321 compliance with a court order shall not be considered to be evidence of
322 such responsiveness; and (L) whether the particular method of election,
323 ordinance, regulation or other law regarding the administration of
324 elections, standard, practice, procedure or policy was designed to
325 advance, and does materially advance, a valid state interest.
326 Sec. 8. Subsection (d) of section 9-368j of the general statutes is
327 repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1,
328 2026, and applicable to complaints brought on or after July 1, 2026):
329 (d) Any individual aggrieved by a violation of this section, any
330 organization whose membership includes individuals aggrieved by
331 such a violation or the Secretary of the State may file an action alleging
332 a violation of this section in the superior court for the judicial district [in
333 which such violation has occurred] of Hartford or for the judicial district
334 of Bridgeport. Members of two or more protected classes that are
335 politically cohesive in a municipality may jointly file such an action in
336 such court.
337 Sec. 9. Subdivision (1) of subsection (e) of section 9-368j of the general
338 statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof
339 (Effective July 1, 2026, and applicable to complaints brought on or after July 1,
340 2026):
341 (e) (1) Notwithstanding any provision of this title and any special act,
342 charter or home rule ordinance, whenever the superior court for [a] the
343 judicial district of Hartford or for the judicial district of Bridgeport finds
344 a violation by a municipality [within such judicial district] of any
345 provision of this section, such court shall order appropriate remedies
346 that are tailored to address such violation in such municipality and to
347 ensure protected class members have equitable opportunities to fully
348 participate in the political process and that can be implemented in a
349 manner that will not unduly disrupt the administration of an ongoing
350 or imminent election. Such court shall take into account the ability of
351 officials who administer elections in such municipality to implement
352 any change to voting for an ongoing or imminent election in a manner
353 that is orderly and fiscally sound, and shall not order any remedy that
sHB5344 / File No. 194 11

sHB5344 File No. 194
354 contravenes the Constitution of Connecticut. Appropriate remedies
355 may include, but need not be limited to: (A) A district-based method of
356 election; (B) an alternative method of election; (C) new or revised
357 districting or redistricting plans; (D) elimination of staggered elections
358 so that all members of the legislative body are elected at the same time;
359 (E) reasonably increasing the size of the legislative body; (F) additional
360 voting days or hours; (G) additional polling places; (H) additional
361 means of voting, such as voting by mail, or additional opportunities to
362 return ballots; (I) holding of special elections; (J) expanded
363 opportunities for admission of electors; (K) additional elector education;
364 (L) the restoration or addition of individuals to registry lists; or (M)
365 retaining jurisdiction for such period of time as the court may deem
366 appropriate, during which period no qualification for eligibility to be an
367 elector or prerequisite to voting, or standard, practice or procedure with
368 respect to voting, that is different from that which was in effect at the
369 time an action under subsection (d) of this section was commenced shall
370 be enforced unless the court finds that such qualification, prerequisite,
371 standard, practice or procedure does not have the purpose, and will not
372 have the effect, of impairing the right to vote on the basis of protected
373 class membership or in contravention of the guarantees with respect to
374 such right that are set forth in sections 9-368j to 9-368q, inclusive, as
375 amended by this act, provided, in any action brought pursuant to
376 chapter 149, any remedy ordered shall be consistent with the provisions
377 of said chapter. Notwithstanding the provisions of subparagraph (M) of
378 this subdivision, any such finding by the court shall not be a bar to any
379 subsequent action to enjoin enforcement of such qualification,
380 prerequisite, standard, practice or procedure.
381 Sec. 10. Subparagraphs (E) and (F) of subdivision (2) of subsection (g)
382 of section 9-368j of the general statutes are repealed and the following is
383 substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026, and applicable to
384 complaints brought on or after July 1, 2026):
385 (E) If, pursuant to the provisions of this subsection, a municipality
386 enacts or implements a remedy or the Secretary of the State approves a
387 proposed remedy, a party who sent a notification letter described in
sHB5344 / File No. 194 12

sHB5344 File No. 194
388 subdivision (1) of this subsection regarding a potential violation that is
389 related to such remedy may, not later than thirty days after such
390 enactment, implementation or approval, submit a claim for
391 reimbursement from such municipality for the costs associated with
392 producing and sending such notification letter. Such party shall submit
393 such claim in writing and substantiate such claim with financial
394 documentation, including a detailed invoice for any demography
395 services or analysis of voting patterns in such municipality. Upon
396 receipt of any such claim, such municipality may request additional
397 financial documentation if that which has been provided by such party
398 is insufficient to substantiate such costs. Such municipality shall
399 reimburse such party for reasonable costs claimed or for an amount to
400 which such party and such municipality agree, except that the
401 cumulative amount of any such reimbursements to all such parties other
402 than the Secretary of the State shall not exceed fifty thousand dollars,
403 adjusted in accordance with any change in the consumer price index for
404 all urban consumers as published by the United States Department of
405 Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics. If any such party and such
406 municipality fail to agree to a reimbursement amount, either such party
407 or such municipality may file an action for a declaratory judgment with
408 the superior court for the judicial district [in which such municipality is
409 located] of Hartford or for the judicial district of Bridgeport for a
410 clarification of rights.
411 (F) (i) Notwithstanding the provisions of this subsection, a party
412 described in subsection (d) of this section may seek preliminary relief
413 for a regular election held in a municipality by filing an action pursuant
414 to this section during the one hundred twenty days prior to such regular
415 election. Not later than the filing of such action, such party shall send a
416 notification letter described in subdivision (1) of this subsection to such
417 municipality. In the event any such action is withdrawn or dismissed as
418 being moot as a result of such municipality's enactment or
419 implementation of a remedy, or the approval by the Secretary of the
420 State of a proposed remedy, any such party may only submit a claim for
421 reimbursement in accordance with the provisions of subparagraph (E)
422 of this subdivision.
sHB5344 / File No. 194 13

sHB5344 File No. 194
423 (ii) In the case of preliminary relief sought pursuant to subparagraph
424 (F)(i) of this subdivision by a party described in subsection (d) of this
425 section, the superior court for the judicial district [in which such
426 municipality is located] of Hartford or for the judicial district of
427 Bridgeport shall grant such relief if such court determines that (I) such
428 party has shown a substantial likelihood of success on the merits, and
429 (II) it is possible to implement an appropriate remedy that would
430 resolve the violation alleged under this section prior to such election in
431 a manner that will not unduly disrupt such election.
432 Sec. 11. Subsection (g) of section 9-368l of the general statutes is
433 repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1,
434 2026, and applicable to complaints brought on or after July 1, 2026):
435 (g) Any individual aggrieved by a violation of this section, any
436 organization whose membership includes individuals aggrieved by
437 such a violation or the Secretary of the State may file an action alleging
438 a violation of this section in the superior court for the judicial district [in
439 which such violation has occurred] of Hartford or for the judicial district
440 of Bridgeport, except that no determination of the Secretary under this
441 section to designate a municipality or a language for the provision of
442 assistance shall constitute a violation of this section.
443 Sec. 12. Subsection (a) of section 9-368m of the general statutes is
444 repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1,
445 2026, and applicable to complaints brought on or after July 1, 2026):
446 (a) In accordance with the provisions of this section, the enactment or
447 implementation of a covered policy, as described in subsection (b) of this
448 section, by a covered jurisdiction, as described in subsection (c) of this
449 section, shall be subject to preclearance, as described in subsections (e)
450 and (f) of this section, by the Secretary of the State or the superior court
451 for the judicial district [in which such covered jurisdiction is located] of
452 Hartford or for the judicial district of Bridgeport.
453 Sec. 13. Subdivision (1) of subsection (f) of section 9-368m of the
454 general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
sHB5344 / File No. 194 14

sHB5344 File No. 194
455 thereof (Effective July 1, 2026, and applicable to complaints brought on or after
456 July 1, 2026):
457 (f) (1) If a covered jurisdiction seeks preclearance from the superior
458 court for the judicial district [in which such covered jurisdiction is
459 located] of Hartford or for the judicial district of Bridgeport for the
460 adoption or implementation of any covered policy, in lieu of seeking
461 such preclearance from the Secretary of the State pursuant to subsection
462 (e) of this section, such covered jurisdiction shall submit, in writing,
463 such covered policy to such court and may obtain such preclearance in
464 accordance with the provisions of this subsection, provided (A) such
465 covered jurisdiction shall also contemporaneously transmit to the
466 Secretary of the State a copy of such submission, and (B) failure to so
467 provide such copy shall result in an automatic denial of such
468 preclearance. Notwithstanding the transmission to the Secretary of a
469 copy of any such submission, the court shall exercise exclusive
470 jurisdiction over such submission. The covered jurisdiction shall bear
471 the burden of proof in the court's determination as to preclearance.
472 Sec. 14. Subsection (g) of section 9-368m of the general statutes is
473 repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1,
474 2026, and applicable to complaints brought on or after July 1, 2026):
475 (g) If any covered jurisdiction enacts or implements any covered
476 policy without obtaining preclearance for such covered policy in
477 accordance with the provisions of this section, the Secretary of the State
478 or any party described in subsection (d) of section 9-368j, as amended
479 by this act, may file an action in the superior court for the judicial district
480 [in which such covered jurisdiction is located] of Hartford or for the
481 judicial district of Bridgeport to enjoin such enactment or
482 implementation and seek sanctions against such covered jurisdiction for
483 violations of this section.
484 Sec. 15. Subdivision (1) of subsection (c) of section 9-368n of the
485 general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
486 thereof (Effective July 1, 2026, and applicable to complaints brought on or after
487 July 1, 2026):
sHB5344 / File No. 194 15

sHB5344 File No. 194
488 (c) (1) Any individual aggrieved by a violation of this section or any
489 organization whose membership includes individuals aggrieved by
490 such a violation may file an action alleging a violation of this section in
491 the superior court for the judicial district [in which such violation has
492 occurred] of Hartford or for the judicial district of Bridgeport. Such an
493 action may be filed irrespective of any action that may be filed by the
494 State Elections Enforcement Commission, the Attorney General or the
495 State's Attorney as a result of such a violation.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 July 1, 2026, and 9-324
applicable to complaints
brought on or after July 1,
2026
Sec. 2 July 1, 2026, and 9-325
applicable to complaints
brought on or after July 1,
2026
Sec. 3 July 1, 2026, and 9-328
applicable to complaints
brought on or after July 1,
2026
Sec. 4 July 1, 2026, and 9-329a
applicable to complaints
brought on or after July 1,
2026
Sec. 5 July 1, 2026, and 9-329b
applicable to complaints
brought on or after July 1,
2026
Sec. 6 July 1, 2026, and 9-368j(b)(2)(B)
applicable to complaints
brought on or after July 1,
2026
Sec. 7 July 1, 2026, and 9-368j(c)(1)
applicable to complaints
brought on or after July 1,
2026
sHB5344 / File No. 194 16

sHB5344 File No. 194
Sec. 8 July 1, 2026, and 9-368j(d)
applicable to complaints
brought on or after July 1,
2026
Sec. 9 July 1, 2026, and 9-368j(e)(1)
applicable to complaints
brought on or after July 1,
2026
Sec. 10 July 1, 2026, and 9-368j(g)(2)(E) and (F)
applicable to complaints
brought on or after July 1,
2026
Sec. 11 July 1, 2026, and 9-368l(g)
applicable to complaints
brought on or after July 1,
2026
Sec. 12 July 1, 2026, and 9-368m(a)
applicable to complaints
brought on or after July 1,
2026
Sec. 13 July 1, 2026, and 9-368m(f)(1)
applicable to complaints
brought on or after July 1,
2026
Sec. 14 July 1, 2026, and 9-368m(g)
applicable to complaints
brought on or after July 1,
2026
Sec. 15 July 1, 2026, and 9-368n(c)(1)
applicable to complaints
brought on or after July 1,
2026
Statement of Legislative Commissioners:
In Section 3(c), references to "the court" were changed to references to
"such superior court" and "[under him] thereunder" was changed to
"under [him] such party", for clarity.
GAE Joint Favorable Subst. -LCO
sHB5344 / File No. 194 17

sHB5344 File No. 194
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill, which requires certain election-related cases to be handled
by the superior courts for the judicial districts of Hartford or Bridgeport,
is not anticipated to result in a fiscal impact to the state, as the affected
state agencies can meet these requirements within existing resources.
The Out Years
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
sHB5344 / File No. 194 18

sHB5344 File No. 194
OLR Bill Analysis
sHB 5344
AN ACT CONCERNING SUPERIOR COURT VENUE FOR ELECTION
CASES.